Hawaii statutes.
§653-4 Further exemption. The wages
received by every person receiving less than $60 per month when paid from any
unemployment work relief fund, the expenditure of which is under the control of
any state commission, board, or other agency, or under the control of any
county or any commission, board, or other agency of any county shall be exempt
from garnishment, attachment, or any other judicial or statutory proceedings
for the taking, sequestration, or withholding thereof for any purpose
whatsoever, including payment of taxes. [L 1933, c 171, §4; RL 1935, §4292; am
L 1935, c 63, §1; RL 1945, §10324; RL 1955, §238-4; HRS §653-4]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next